Illinois, session 104th, HB3217.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 10-511 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/10-511 new)7    Sec. 10-511. Assessment of non-income producing wooded 8acreage.9    (a) Beginning with the 2025 assessment year and continuing 10through the earlier of the 2039 assessment year or the first 11year in which the property no longer qualifies for assessment 12under this Section, the assessed value of non-income producing 13wooded acreage property that is subject to assessment under 14this Section may not exceed the product of the assessed value 15of the property for the immediately preceding assessment year 16multiplied by 104%. 17    (b) As used in this Section, "non-income producing wooded 18acreage" means wooded acreage that does not generate an annual 19net income, as defined in subsection (a) of Section 10-220.  20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.